Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-46] Conditions of importation under
certification. (a) A certificate issued to an importer under this part is
nontransferable.

(b) Every importer issued a certificate shall
comply with the requirements of the certificate.

(c) Any department employee or authorized
representative may enter the premises under certification at any reasonable
time to examine and inspect any microorganism, records, laboratory or other
contained system approved by the department, equipment, procedures, manuals, and
other related materials pertaining to the microorganism imported pursuant to
certificate, and may conduct tests, collect samples, or perform any other duty
for the purpose of carrying out and effectuating the purposes of this chapter.
[L 1999, c 177, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next